South Dakota, session 2026, HB1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-11:
No person may publish, by electronic means, the home address, date of birth, or
social security number of a judicial officer or law enforcement officer:
(1) Without the officer's consent; and
(2) With the intent to place the officer or the officer's immediate family in reasonable
fear of death or great bodily injury.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.

26.983.11 2 1298
An Act to prohibit the electronic publication of certain information about a judicial officer or
law enforcement officer and provide a penalty therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1298
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1298 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1298 ENROLLED